District of Columbia statutes.
3-2121

Repealed

Practice under false name; false representations concerning degree, application or examination

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(a), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1201 to 2-1233.